Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.070

Responsibility for acts or omissions—Liability—Burden of proof.

(1) The act, omission, or failure of any official, agent, or other person acting for any individual, association, partnership, corporation, or trust within the scope of the person's employment or office shall be deemed the act, omission, or failure of such individual, association, partnership, corporation, or trust, as well as of such official, agent, or other person.

(2) Every person who directly or indirectly controls another person liable under any provision of this chapter, every partner, officer, or director of such other person, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, every employee of such other person who materially aids in the violation is also liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such other person, unless the person who is also liable by virtue of this provision sustains the burden of proof that he or she did not know, and in exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

[ 1986 c 14 s 7.]